District of Columbia statutes.
16-4016

Confidentiality of collaborative law communication.

A collaborative law communication is confidential to the extent agreed by the parties in a signed record or as provided by law of the District of Columbia other than this chapter.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 16 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.